Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB35.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 311.720 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 311.710 to 311.820, and laws of the Commonwealth unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) "Abortion" means the use of any means whatsoever to terminate the pregnancy of a
woman known to be pregnant with intent to cause fetal death;
(2) "Accepted medical procedures" means procedures of the type performed in the
manner and in a facility with equipment sufficient to meet the standards of medical
care which physicians engaged in the same or similar lines of work, would
ordinarily exercise and devote to the benefit of their patients;
(3) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services of the Commonwealth
of Kentucky;
(4) "Consent," as used in KRS 311.710 to 311.820 with reference to those who must
give their consent, means an informed consent expressed by a written agreement to
submit to an abortion on a written form of consent to be promulgated by the
secretary for health and family services;
(5) "Ectopic" means a fetus or embryo which is developing outside of the uterus;
(6) "Family planning services" means educational, medical, and social services and
activities that enable individuals to determine the number and spacing of their
children and to select the means by which this may be achieved;
(7)[(6)] "Fetus" means a human being from fertilization until birth;
(8)[(7)] "Hospital" means those institutions licensed in the Commonwealth of
Kentucky pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 216;
(9)[(8)] "Human being" means any member of the species homo sapiens from
fertilization until death;
(10) "Lethal fetal anomaly" means a fetal condition diagnosed before birth from
Page 1 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
which an unborn child would die at birth or shortly thereafter, or be stillborn;
(11)[(9)] "Medical emergency" means any condition which, on the basis of the
physician's good-faith clinical judgment, so complicates the medical condition of a
pregnant female as to necessitate the immediate abortion of her pregnancy to avert
her death or for which a delay will create serious risk of substantial and irreversible
impairment of a major bodily function;
(12)[(10)] "Medical necessity" means a medical condition of a pregnant woman that, in
the good-faith medical[reasonable] judgment of the physician who is attending the
woman, so complicates the pregnancy that it necessitates the immediate
performance or inducement of an abortion;
(13)[(11)] "Partial-birth abortion" means an abortion in which the physician performing
the abortion partially vaginally delivers a living fetus before killing the fetus and
completing the delivery;
(14)[(12)] "Physician" means any person licensed to practice medicine in the
Commonwealth or osteopathy pursuant to this chapter;
(15)[(13)] "Probable gestational age of the embryo or fetus" means the gestational age
that, in the judgment of a physician, is, with reasonable probability, the gestational
age of the embryo or fetus at the time that the abortion is planned to be performed;
(16)[(14)] "Public agency" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky; any agency,
department, entity, or instrumentality thereof; any city, county, agency, department,
entity, or instrumentality thereof; or any other political subdivision of the
Commonwealth, agency, department, entity, or instrumentality thereof;
(17)[(15)] "Vaginally delivers a living fetus before killing the fetus" means deliberately
and intentionally delivers into the vagina a living fetus, or a substantial portion
thereof, for the purpose of performing a procedure the physician knows will kill the
fetus, and kills the fetus; and
(18)[(16)] "Viability" means that stage of human development when the life of the
Page 2 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
unborn child may be continued by natural or life-supportive systems outside the
womb of the mother.
Section 2. KRS 311.723 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No abortion shall be performed except by a physician[ after either]:
(a) After the physician[He] determines that, in his or her good-faith medical[
best clinical] judgment, the abortion is necessary:
1. To preserve the life of the pregnant woman or to avoid a serious risk
of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily
function of the pregnant woman;
2, To remove a dead unborn fetus caused by spontaneous abortion;
3. To remove an ectopic pregnancy or incomplete miscarriage; or
4. Because of a lethal fetal anomaly or the fetus is incompatible with
sustained life outside the womb;
(b) After the physician[He] receives what he or she reasonably believes to be a
written statement signed by another physician, hereinafter called the
"referring physician," certifying that in the referring physician's good-faith
medical[best clinical] judgment the abortion is necessary, and, in addition, he
or she receives a copy of the report form required by KRS 213.101; or
(c) If, in the good-faith belief of the physician, the pregnancy is the result of
rape under KRS 510.040, 510.050, or 510.060, or incest under KRS 530.020,
and the fetus has not reached viability.
(2) No abortion shall be performed except in compliance with regulations which the
cabinet shall issue to ensure that:
(a) Before the abortion is performed, the pregnant woman shall have a private
medical consultation either with the physician who is to perform the abortion
or with the referring physician in a place, at a time, and of a duration
reasonably sufficient to enable the physician to determine whether, based
Page 3 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
upon the physician's good-faith medical[his best clinical] judgment, the
abortion is necessary;
(b) The physician who is to perform the abortion or the referring physician will
describe the basis for his or her good-faith medical[ best clinical] judgment
that the abortion is necessary on a form prescribed by the cabinet as required
by KRS 213.101; and
(c) Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply when, in the good-faith
medical judgment of the attending physician based on the particular facts of
the case before him or her, there exists a medical emergency. In such a case,
the physician shall describe the basis of his or her good-faith medical
judgment that an emergency exists on a form prescribed by the cabinet as
required by KRS 213.101.
(3) Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, nothing in this chapter shall be
construed as prohibiting a physician from prescribing or a woman from using birth
control methods or devices, including[,] but not limited to[,] intrauterine devices,
oral contraceptives, or any other birth control method or device.
Section 3. KRS 311.725 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No abortion shall be performed or induced except with the voluntary and informed
written consent of the woman upon whom the abortion is to be performed or
induced. Except in the case of a medical emergency, consent to an abortion is
voluntary and informed if and only if:
(a) At least twenty-four (24) hours prior to the abortion, a physician, licensed
nurse, physician assistant, or social worker to whom the responsibility has
been delegated by the physician has verbally informed the woman of all of the
following:
1. The nature and purpose of the particular abortion procedure or treatment
to be performed and of those medical risks and alternatives to the
Page 4 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
procedure or treatment that a reasonable patient would consider material
to the decision of whether or not to undergo the abortion;
2. The probable gestational age of the embryo or fetus at the time the
abortion is to be performed;
3. The medical risks associated with the pregnant woman carrying her
pregnancy to term; and
4. The potential ability of a physician to reverse the effects of prescription
drugs intended to induce abortion, where additional information about
this possibility may be obtained, and contact information for assistance
in locating a physician who may aid in the reversal;
(b) At least twenty-four (24) hours prior to the abortion, in an individual, private
setting, a physician, licensed nurse, physician assistant, or social worker to
whom the responsibility has been delegated by the physician has informed the
pregnant woman that:
1. The cabinet publishes the printed materials described in subsection
(2)(a), (b), and (c) of this section and that she has a right to review the
printed materials and that copies will be provided to her by the
physician, licensed nurse, physician assistant, or social worker free of
charge if she chooses to review the printed materials;
2. Medical assistance benefits may be available for prenatal care,
childbirth, and neonatal care, and that more detailed information on the
availability of such assistance is contained in the printed materials
published by the cabinet;
3. The father of the fetus is liable to assist in the support of her child, even
in instances where he has offered to pay for the abortion; and
4. It is illegal in Kentucky to intentionally perform an abortion, in whole or
in part, because of:
Page 5 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
a. The sex of the unborn child;
b. The race, color, or national origin of the unborn child; or
c. The diagnosis, or potential diagnosis, of Down syndrome or any
other disability, except a lethal fetal anomaly or the fetus is
incompatible with sustained life outside of the womb;
(c) At least twenty-four (24) hours prior to the abortion, a copy of the printed
materials has been provided to the pregnant woman if she chooses to view
these materials;
(d) The pregnant woman certifies in writing, prior to the performance or
inducement of the abortion:
1. That she has received the information required to be provided under
paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection; and
2. That she consents to the particular abortion voluntarily and knowingly,
and she is not under the influence of any drug of abuse or alcohol; and
(e) Prior to the performance or inducement of the abortion, the physician who is
scheduled to perform or induce the abortion or the physician's agent receives a
copy of the pregnant woman's signed statement, on a form which may be
provided by the physician, on which she consents to the abortion and that
includes the certification required by paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(2) [By January 1, 1999, ]The cabinet shall cause to be published in English in a
typeface not less than 12 point type the following[ materials]:
(a) Materials that inform the pregnant woman about public and private agencies
and services that are available to assist her through her pregnancy, upon
childbirth, and while her child is dependent, including[,] but not limited to[,]
adoption agencies. The materials shall include a comprehensive list of the
available agencies and a description of the services offered by the agencies
and the telephone numbers and addresses of the agencies, and inform the
Page 6 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
pregnant woman about available medical assistance benefits for prenatal care,
childbirth, and neonatal care and about the support obligations of the father of
a child who is born alive. The cabinet shall ensure that the materials are
comprehensive and do not directly or indirectly promote, exclude, or
discourage the use of any agency or service described in this section;
(b) Materials that inform the pregnant woman of the probable anatomical and
physiological characteristics of the zygote, blastocyte, embryo, or fetus at two
(2) week gestational increments for the first sixteen (16) weeks of her
pregnancy and at four (4) week gestational increments from the seventeenth
week of her pregnancy to full term, including any relevant information
regarding the time at which the fetus possibly would be viable. The materials
shall use language that is understandable by the average person who is not
medically trained, shall be objective and nonjudgmental, and shall include
only accurate scientific information about the zygote, blastocyte, embryo, or
fetus at the various gestational increments. The materials shall include, for
each of the two (2) or[of] four (4) week increments specified in this
paragraph, a pictorial or photographic depiction of the zygote, blastocyte,
embryo, or fetus. The materials shall also include, in a conspicuous manner, a
scale or other explanation that is understandable by the average person and
that can be used to determine the actual size of the zygote, blastocyte, embryo,
or fetus at a particular gestational increment as contrasted with the depicted
size of the zygote, blastocyte, embryo, or fetus at that gestational increment;
and
(c) Materials that inform the pregnant woman of the potential ability of a
physician to reverse the effects of prescription drugs intended to induce
abortion, where additional information about this possibility may be obtained,
and contact information for assistance in locating a physician who may aid in
Page 7 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
the reversal.
(3) Upon submission of a request to the cabinet by any person, hospital, physician, or
medical facility for one (1) or more copies of the materials published in accordance
with subsection (2) of this section, the cabinet shall make the requested number of
copies of the materials available to the person, hospital, physician, or medical
facility that requested the copies.
(4) If a medical emergency or medical necessity compels the performance or
inducement of an abortion, the physician who will perform or induce the abortion,
prior to its performance or inducement if possible, shall inform the pregnant woman
of the medical indications supporting the physician's judgment that an immediate
abortion is necessary. Any physician who performs or induces an abortion without
the prior satisfaction of the conditions specified in subsection (1) of this section
because of a medical emergency or medical necessity shall enter the reasons for the
conclusion that a medical emergency or medical necessity exists in the medical
record of the pregnant woman.
(5) If the conditions specified in subsection (1) of this section are satisfied, consent to
an abortion shall be presumed to be valid and effective.
(6) The failure of a physician to satisfy the conditions of subsection (1) of this section
prior to performing or inducing an abortion upon a pregnant woman may be the
basis of disciplinary action pursuant to KRS 311.595.
(7) The cabinet shall charge a fee for each copy of the materials distributed in
accordance with subsections (1) and (3) of this section. The fee shall be sufficient to
cover the cost of the administration of the materials published in accordance with
subsection (2) of this section, including the cost of preparation and distribution of
materials.
Section 4. KRS 311.727 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
Page 8 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
(a) "Auscultate[Ascultate]" means to examine by listening for sounds made by
internal organs of the fetus, specifically for a fetal heartbeat, utilizing an
ultrasound transducer or a fetal heart rate monitor;
(b) "Obstetric ultrasound" or "ultrasound" means the use of ultrasonic waves for
diagnostic or therapeutic purposes, specifically to monitor a developing fetus;
and
(c) "Qualified technician" means a medical imaging technologist as defined in
KRS 311B.020 who is certified in obstetrics and gynecology by the American
Registry for Diagnostic Medical Sonography or a nurse midwife or advance
practice nurse practitioner in obstetrics with certification in obstetrical
ultrasonography.
(2) Prior to a woman giving informed consent to having any part of an abortion
performed, the physician who is to perform the abortion or a qualified technician to
whom the responsibility has been delegated by the physician shall:
(a) Perform an obstetric ultrasound on the pregnant woman;
(b) Provide a simultaneous explanation of what the ultrasound is depicting, which
shall include the presence and location of the unborn child within the uterus
and the number of unborn children depicted and also, if the ultrasound image
indicates that fetal demise has occurred, inform the woman of that fact;
(c) Display the ultrasound images so that the pregnant woman may view the
images;
(d) Auscultate[Ascultate] the fetal heartbeat of the unborn child so that the
pregnant woman may hear the heartbeat if the heartbeat is audible;
(e) Provide a medical description of the ultrasound images, which shall include
the dimensions of the embryo or fetus and the presence of external members
and internal organs, if present and viewable; and
(f) Retain in the woman's medical record a signed certification from the pregnant
Page 9 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
woman that she has been presented with the information required to be
provided under paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection and has viewed the
ultrasound images, listened to the heartbeat if the heartbeat is audible, or
declined to do so. The signed certification shall be on a form prescribed by the
cabinet.
(3) When the ultrasound images and heartbeat sounds are provided to and reviewed
with the pregnant woman, nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the
pregnant woman from averting her eyes from the ultrasound images or requesting
the volume of the heartbeat be reduced or turned off if the heartbeat is audible.
Neither the physician, the qualified technician, nor the pregnant woman shall be
subject to any penalty if the pregnant woman refuses to look at the displayed
ultrasound images or to listen to the heartbeat if the heartbeat is audible.
(4) The requirements of this section shall be in addition to any requirement contained
in KRS 311.725 or any other section of KRS 311.710 to 311.820.
(5) The provisions of this section shall not apply:
(a) In the case of a medical emergency or medical necessity. If a medical
emergency or medical necessity compels the performance or inducement of an
abortion, the physician who will perform or induce the abortion, prior to its
performance or inducement if possible, shall inform the pregnant woman of
the medical indications supporting the physician's judgment that an immediate
abortion is necessary. Any physician who performs or induces an abortion
without the prior satisfaction of the requirements of this section because of a
medical emergency or medical necessity shall enter the reasons for the
conclusion that a medical emergency or medical necessity exists in the
medical record of the pregnant woman;
(b) If the fetus the pregnant woman is carrying has a lethal anomaly or is
incompatible with sustained life outside of the womb; or
Page 10 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
(c) If, in the good-faith belief of the physician, the pregnancy is the result of
rape under KRS 510.040, 510.050, or 510.060, or incest under KRS 530.020,
and the fetus has not reached viability.
Section 5. KRS 311.732 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section the following definitions shall apply:
(a) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen (18);
(b) "Emancipated minor" means any minor who is or has been married or has by
court order or otherwise been freed from the care, custody, and control of her
parents; and
(c) "Abortion" means the use of any instrument, medicine, drug, or any other
substance or device with intent to terminate the pregnancy of a woman known
to be pregnant with intent other than to increase the probability of a live birth,
to preserve the life or health of the child after live birth,[ or] to remove a dead
fetus, ectopic pregnancy, or incomplete miscarriage, or as provided under
subsection (4) of this section.
(2) No person shall perform an abortion upon a minor unless:
(a) The attending physician has secured the informed written consent of the
minor and one (1) parent or legal guardian with joint or physical custody and
the consenting parent or legal guardian of the minor has made a reasonable
attempt to notify any other parent with joint or physical custody at least forty-
eight (48) hours prior to providing the informed written consent.
1. Notice shall not be required to be provided to any parent who has:
a. Previously been enjoined by a domestic violence order or
interpersonal protective order, regardless of whether or not the
person to be protected by the order was the minor; or
b. Been convicted of, or entered into a diversion program for, a
criminal offense against a victim who is a minor as defined in
Page 11 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
KRS 17.500 or for a violent or sexual criminal offense under KRS
Chapter 506, 507, 507A, 508, 509, 510, 529, 530, or 531.
2. The informed written consent shall include:
a. A copy of the minor's government-issued identification, a copy of
the consenting parent's or legal guardian's government-issued
identification, and written documentation including but not limited
to a birth certificate, court-ordered custodial paperwork, or tax
return, establishing that he or she is the lawful parent or legal
guardian; and
b. The parent's or legal guardian's certification that he or she consents
to the abortion. The certification shall be in a signed, dated, and
notarized document that has been initialed on each page and that
contains the following statement, which shall precede the signature
of the parent or legal guardian: "I, (insert name of parent or legal
guardian), am the (select "parent" or "legal guardian") of (insert
name of minor) and give consent for (insert name of attending
physician) to perform an abortion on her. Under penalties of
perjury, I declare that I have read the foregoing statement and that
the facts stated in it are true."
3. The attending physician shall keep a copy of the informed written
consent in the medical file of the minor for five (5) years after the minor
reaches eighteen (18) years of age or for seven (7) years, whichever is
longer.
4. The attending physician securing the informed written consent from a
parent or legal guardian under this subsection shall execute for inclusion
in the medical record of the minor an affidavit stating: "I, (insert name
of attending physician), certify that, according to my best information
Page 12 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
and belief, a reasonable person under similar circumstances would rely
on the information presented by both the minor and her parent or legal
guardian as sufficient evidence of identity.";
(b) The minor is emancipated and the attending physician has received the
informed written consent of the minor; or
(c) The minor elects to petition any Circuit or District Court of the
Commonwealth pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and obtain an order
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section granting consent to the abortion and
the attending physician has received the informed written consent of the
minor.
(3) Every minor shall have the right to petition any Circuit or District Court of the
Commonwealth for an order granting the right to self-consent to an abortion
pursuant to the following procedures:
(a) The minor or her next friend may prepare and file a petition setting forth the
request of the minor for an order of consent to an abortion;
(b) The court shall ensure that the minor prepares or her next friend is given
assistance in preparing and filing the petition and shall ensure that the minor's
identity is kept anonymous;
(c) The minor may participate in proceedings in the court on her own behalf or
through her next friend and the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for her.
The court shall advise her that she has a right to court-appointed counsel and
shall provide her with such counsel upon her request;
(d) All proceedings under this section shall be anonymous and shall be given
preference over other matters to ensure that the court may reach a decision
promptly, but in no case shall the court fail to rule within seventy-two (72)
hours of the time of application, provided that the seventy-two (72) hour
limitation may be extended at the request of the minor; and
Page 13 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
(e) The court shall hold a hearing on the merits of the petition before reaching a
decision. The court shall hear evidence at the hearing relating to:
1. The minor's:
a. Age;
b. Emotional development and stability;
c. Maturity;
d. Intellect;
e. Credibility and demeanor as a witness;
f. Ability to accept responsibility;
g. Ability to assess both the current and future life-impacting
consequences of, and alternatives to, the abortion; and
h. Ability to understand and explain the medical risks of the abortion
and to apply that understanding to her decision; and
2. Whether there may be any undue influence by another on the minor's
decision to have an abortion.
(4) (a) If the court finds by:
1. Clear and convincing evidence that the minor is sufficiently mature to
decide whether to have an abortion;
2. Clear and convincing evidence that the requirements of this section are
not in the best interest of the minor; or
3. A preponderance of the evidence that the minor is:
a. The victim of child abuse or sexual abuse inflicted by one (1) or
both of her parents or her legal guardian;
b. Pregnant as a result of rape under KRS 510.040, 510.050, or
510.060, or incest under KRS 530.020, and the fetus has not
reached viability;
c. Pregnant with a fetus that has a lethal fetal abnormality or the
Page 14 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
fetus is incompatible with sustained life outside the womb; or
d. Requires the abortion to remove a dead fetus, ectopic pregnancy,
or incomplete miscarriage;
the court shall enter a written order, making specific factual findings and legal
conclusions supporting its decision to grant the petition for an abortion.
(b) If the court does not make any of the findings specified in paragraph (a) of
this subsection, the court shall deny the petition.
(c) As used in this subsection, "best interest of the minor" shall not include
financial best interest, financial considerations, or the potential financial
impact on the minor or the minor's family if the minor does not have an
abortion.
(5) Any minor shall have the right of anonymous and expedited appeal to the Court of
Appeals, and that court shall give precedence over other pending matters.
(6) All hearings under this section, including appeals, shall remain confidential and
closed to the public. The hearings shall be held in chambers or in a similarly private
and informal setting within the courthouse.
(7) No fees shall be required of any minor who declares she has no sufficient funds to
pursue the procedures provided by this section.
(8) (a) The Supreme Court is respectfully requested to promulgate any rules and
regulations it feels are necessary to ensure that proceedings under this section
are handled in an expeditious and anonymous manner.
(b) The Supreme Court, through the Administrative Office of the Courts, shall
report by February 1 of each year to the Legislative Research Commission
and the cabinet on the number of petitions filed under subsection (3) of this
section for the preceding year, and the timing and manner of disposal of the
petition by each court. For each approved petition granting an abortion filed
under subsection (3) of this section, the specific court finding in subsection
Page 15 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
(4) of this section shall be included in the report.
(9) (a) The requirements of subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section shall not apply
when, in the best medical judgment of the physician based on the facts of the
case before him or her, a medical emergency exists that so complicates the
pregnancy as to require an immediate abortion.
(b) If a medical emergency exists, the physician shall make reasonable attempts,
whenever possible, and without endangering the minor, to contact the parent
or legal guardian of the minor, and may proceed, but must document reasons
for the medical necessity in the minor's medical records.
(c) The physician shall inform the parent or legal guardian, in person or by
telephone, within twenty-four (24) hours of the abortion, including details of
the medical emergency that necessitated the abortion without the parent's or
legal guardian's consent. The physician shall also provide this information in
writing to the parent or legal guardian at his or her last known address by
first-class mail or by certified mail, return receipt requested, with delivery
restricted to the parent or legal guardian.
(10) A report indicating the basis for any medical judgment that warrants failure to
obtain consent pursuant to this section shall be filed with the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services on a form supplied by the cabinet. This report shall be confidential.
(11) Failure to obtain consent pursuant to the requirements of this section is prima facie
evidence of failure to obtain informed consent and of interference with family
relations in appropriate civil actions. The law of this state shall not be construed to
preclude the award of exemplary damages in any appropriate civil action relevant to
violations of this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the
common-law rights of parents.
(12) A minor upon whom an abortion is performed is not guilty of violating this section.
Section 6. KRS 311.735 is amended to read as follows:
Page 16 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
(1) Prior to performing an abortion, the physician who is to perform the abortion or the
physician's[his] agent shall notify, if reasonably possible, the spouse of the woman
upon whom the abortion is to be performed. If it is not reasonably possible to notify
the spouse prior to the abortion, the physician or his or her agent shall do so, if
reasonably possible, within thirty (30) days of the abortion.
(2) (a) The requirements of this section shall not apply if, before the abortion is
performed, either party to a marriage has filed a petition for dissolution of
marriage which has been served on the respondent.[;]
(b) The requirements of this section shall not apply when, in the medical
judgment of the attending physician based on the particular facts of the case
before the physician[him], there exists a medical emergency. In such a case,
the physician shall describe the basis of his or her medical judgment that such
an emergency exists on a form prescribed by the cabinet as required by KRS
213.101, and the physician or his or her agent shall notify, if reasonably
possible, the spouse of the woman upon whom the abortion was performed,
within thirty (30) days of the abortion.
(c) The requirements of this section shall not apply when the abortion is
performed or induced:
1. To remove a dead unborn fetus;
2. To remove an ectopic pregnancy or incomplete miscarriage;
3. Due to a lethal fetal anomaly or the fetus is incompatible with
sustained life outside of the womb; or
4. By a physician with the good-faith belief that the pregnancy is the
result of rape under KRS 510.040, 510.050, or 510.060, or incest
under KRS 530.020, and the fetus has not reached viability.
(3) Failure to notify a spouse as required by this section is prima facie evidence of
interference with family relations in appropriate civil actions. The law of this
Page 17 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
Commonwealth shall not be construed to preclude the award of punitive damages or
damages for emotional distress, even if unaccompanied by physical complications
in any civil action brought pursuant to violations of this section. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to limit the common law rights of a husband.
Section 7. KRS 311.760 is amended to read as follows:
An abortion may be performed in this state only under the following circumstances:
(1) During the first trimester of pregnancy by a woman upon herself upon the advice of
a licensed physician or by a licensed physician.
(2) After the first trimester of pregnancy, except in cases of emergency to protect the
life or health of the pregnant woman, where an abortion is permitted under other
provisions of KRS 311.710 to 311.820 or 311.7701 to 311.7711, by a duly licensed
physician in a hospital duly licensed by the Kentucky Health Facilities and Health
Services Certificate of Need and Licensure Board.
Section 8. KRS 311.7701 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 311.7701 to 311.7711:
(1) "Conception" means fertilization;
(2) "Contraceptive" means a drug, device, or chemical that prevents conception;
(3) "Fertilization" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.781;
(4) "Fetal heartbeat" means cardiac activity or the steady and repetitive rhythmic
contraction of the fetal heart within the gestational sac;
(5) "Fetus" means the human offspring developing during pregnancy from the moment
of conception and includes the embryonic stage of development;
(6) "Frivolous conduct" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.784;
(7) "Gestational age" means the age of an unborn human individual as calculated from
the first day of the last menstrual period of a pregnant woman;
(8) "Gestational sac" means the structure that comprises the extraembryonic
membranes that envelop the fetus and that is typically visible by ultrasound after
Page 18 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
the fourth week of pregnancy;
(9) "Intrauterine pregnancy" means a pregnancy in which the fetus is attached to the
placenta within the uterus of the pregnant woman;
(10) "Lethal fetal anomaly" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act;
(11) "Medical emergency" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.781;
(12)[(11)] "Physician" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.720;
(13)[(12)] "Pregnancy" means the human female reproductive condition that begins with
fertilization, when the woman is carrying the developing human offspring, and that
is calculated from the first day of the last menstrual period of the woman;
(14)[(13)] "Serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily
function" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.781;
(15)[(14)] "Spontaneous miscarriage" means the natural or accidental termination of a
pregnancy and the expulsion of the fetus, typically caused by genetic defects in the
fetus or physical abnormalities in the pregnant woman;
(16)[(15)] "Standard medical practice" means the degree of skill, care, and diligence that
a physician of the same medical specialty would employ in like circumstances. As
applied to the method used to determine the presence of a fetal heartbeat for
purposes of KRS 311.7704, "standard medical practice" includes employing the
appropriate means of detection depending on the estimated gestational age of the
fetus and the condition of the woman and her pregnancy;[ and]
(17)[(16)] "Unborn child" and "unborn human individual" have the same meaning as
"unborn child" has in KRS 311.781; and
(18) "Viability" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act.
Section 9. KRS 311.7706 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no person shall intentionally
perform or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman with the specific intent of
causing or abetting the termination of the life of the unborn human individual the
Page 19 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
pregnant woman is carrying and whose fetal heartbeat has been detected in
accordance with KRS 311.7704(1).
(2) (a) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to a physician who performs a
medical procedure that, in the physician's good-faith[reasonable] medical
judgment:[,]
1. Is designed or intended to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to
prevent a serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a
major bodily function of the pregnant woman;
2. Is necessary because of a lethal fetal anomaly or the fetus is
incompatible with sustained life outside the womb; or
3. Is performed because, in the good-faith belief of the physician, the
pregnancy is the result of rape under KRS 510.040, 510.050, or
510.060, or incest under KRS 530.020, and the fetus has not reached
viability.
(b) A physician who performs a medical procedure as described in paragraph
(a)1. of this subsection shall, in writing:
1. Declare that the medical procedure is necessary, to the best of the
physician's good-faith[reasonable] medical judgment, to prevent the
death of the pregnant woman or to prevent a serious risk of the
substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the
pregnant woman; and
2. Specify the pregnant woman's medical condition that the medical
procedure is asserted to address and the medical rationale for the
physician's conclusion that the medical procedure is necessary to
prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to prevent a serious risk of
the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of
the pregnant woman.
Page 20 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
(c) A physician who performs a medical procedure as described in paragraph
(a)2. of this subsection shall, in writing:
1. Declare that the medical procedure is necessary, to the best of the
physician's good-faith medical judgment, because of a lethal fetal
anomaly or the fetus is incompatible with sustained life outside the
womb; and
2. Specify the lethal anomaly or condition of the fetus that is
incompatible with sustained life outside the womb.
(d) A physician who performs a medical procedure as described in paragraph
(a)3. of this subsection shall, in writing, specify the basis for the
determination that the fetus has not reached viability.
(e) The physician shall place the written document required by paragraph (b),
(c), or (d)[paragraph (b)] of this subsection in the pregnant woman's medical
records. The physician shall maintain a copy of the document in the
physician's own records for at least seven (7) years from the date the
document is created.
(3) A person is not in violation of subsection (1) of this section if the person acts in
accordance with KRS 311.7704(1) and the method used to determine the presence
of a fetal heartbeat does not reveal a fetal heartbeat.
(4) A pregnant woman on whom an abortion is intentionally performed or induced in
violation of subsection (1) of this section is not guilty of violating subsection (1) of
this section or of attempting to commit, conspiring to commit, or complicity in
committing a violation of subsection (1) of this section. In addition, the pregnant
woman is not subject to a civil penalty based on the abortion being performed or
induced in violation of subsection (1) of this section.
(5) Subsection (1) of this section shall not repeal or limit any other provision of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes that restricts or regulates the performance or inducement
Page 21 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
of an abortion by a particular method or during a particular stage of a pregnancy.
Section 10. KRS 311.772 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Fertilization" means that point in time when a male human sperm penetrates
the zona pellucida of a female human ovum;
(b) "Pregnant" means the human female reproductive condition of having a living
unborn human being within her body throughout the entire embryonic and
fetal stages of the unborn child from fertilization to full gestation and
childbirth; and
(c) "Unborn human being" means an individual living member of the species
homo sapiens throughout the entire embryonic and fetal stages of the unborn
child from fertilization to full gestation and childbirth.
(2) The provisions of this section shall become effective immediately upon, and to the
extent permitted, by the occurrence of any of the following circumstances:
(a) Any decision of the United States Supreme Court which reverses, in whole or
in part, Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973), thereby restoring to the
Commonwealth of Kentucky the authority to prohibit abortion; or
(b) Adoption of an amendment to the United States Constitution which, in whole
or in part, restores to the Commonwealth of Kentucky the authority to prohibit
abortion.
(3) (a) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (6) of this section, no person may
knowingly:
1. Administer to, prescribe for, procure for, or sell to any pregnant woman
any medicine, drug, or other substance with the specific intent of
causing or abetting the termination of the life of an unborn human being;
or
2. Use or employ any instrument or procedure upon a pregnant woman
Page 22 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
with the specific intent of causing or abetting the termination of the life
of an unborn human being.
(b) Any person who violates paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be guilty of a
Class D felony.
(4) The following shall not be a violation of subsection (3) of this section:
(a) For a licensed physician to perform a medical procedure necessary in the
good-faith[reasonable] medical judgment of the physician to prevent the
death or substantial risk of death due to a physical condition, or to prevent the
serious, permanent impairment of a life-sustaining organ of a pregnant
woman. However, except in circumstances under paragraphs (b) and (c) of
this subsection, the physician shall make reasonable medical efforts under the
circumstances to preserve both the life of the mother and the life of the unborn
human being in a manner consistent with reasonable medical practice;[ or]
(b) For a licensed physician to perform an abortion because of a lethal fetal
anomaly or the fetus is incompatible with sustained life outside the womb of
the pregnant woman;
(c) For a licensed physician to perform an abortion if, in the good-faith belief
of the physician, the pregnancy is the result of rape under KRS 510.040,
510.050, or 510.060, or incest under KRS 530.020, and the fetus has not
reached viability; or
(d) Medical treatment provided to the mother by a licensed physician which
results in the accidental or unintentional injury or death to the unborn human
being.
(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to subject the pregnant mother upon
whom any abortion is performed or attempted to any criminal conviction and
penalty.
(6) (a) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit the sale, use,
Page 23 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
prescription, or administration of a contraceptive measure, drug, or chemical,
if it is administered prior to the time when a pregnancy could be determined
through conventional medical testing and if the contraceptive measure is sold,
used, prescribed, or administered in accordance with manufacturer
instructions.
(b) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit the sale, use,
prescription, or administration of any medicine, drug, or other substance
with the specific intent of causing or abetting the termination of the life of
an unborn human being in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.
(7) The provisions of this section shall be effective relative to the appropriation of
Medicaid funds, to the extent consistent with any executive order by the President
of the United States, federal statute, appropriation rider, or federal regulation that
sets forth the limited circumstances in which states must fund abortion to remain
eligible to receive federal Medicaid funds pursuant to 42 U.S.C. secs. 1396 et seq.
Section 11. KRS 311.7735 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An abortion-inducing drug as defined in KRS 311.7731 shall not be provided to a
pregnant patient without the informed consent of the patient. Informed consent shall
be obtained at least twenty-four (24) hours before the abortion-inducing drug is
provided to a pregnant patient, except if:
(a) In the good-faith belief of the physician, the pregnancy is the result of rape
under KRS 510.040, 510.050, or 510.060, or incest under KRS 530.020, and
the fetus has not reached viability; or[,]
(b) In the good-faith[reasonable] medical judgment of the qualified physician,
compliance with this subsection would pose a risk of:
1.[(a)] The death of the pregnant patient; or
2.[(b)] The substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major
bodily function, not including psychological or emotional conditions, of
Page 24 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
the pregnant patient.
(2) A qualified physician shall use a form created by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services to obtain the consent required prior to providing an abortion-inducing drug
as defined in KRS 311.7731 and submit the completed form to the cabinet.
(3) A consent form is not valid and consent is not sufficient, unless:
(a) The patient initials each entry, list, description, or declaration required to be
on the consent form;
(b) The patient signs the consent statement; and
(c) The qualified physician signs the qualified physician declaration.
(4) The consent form shall include but is not limited to the following:
(a) The probable gestational age of the unborn child as determined by both
patient history and by ultrasound results used to confirm gestational age;
(b) A detailed description of the steps to complete the drug-induced abortion;
(c) A detailed list of the risks related to the specific abortion-inducing drug as
defined in KRS 311.7731 or drugs to be used, including potential
complications and adverse events as defined in KRS 311.7731;
(d) If the pregnant patient was Rh negative, the pregnant patient was provided
with an Rh negative information fact sheet and offered treatment with the
prevailing medical standard of care to prevent harmful fetal or child outcomes
or Rh incompatibility in future pregnancies;
(e) That the risks of complications from a medication abortion, including
incomplete abortion, increase with advancing gestational age;
(f) That it may be possible to reverse the effects of the abortion-inducing drug if
desired but that this should be done as soon as possible;
(g) That the patient may see the remains of the unborn child in the process of
completing the abortion;
(h) That initial studies suggest that children born after reversing the effects of the
Page 25 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
abortion-inducing drug mifeprex/mifepristone have no greater risk of birth
defects than the general population;
(i) That initial studies suggest that there is no increased risk of maternal mortality
after reversing the effects of the abortion-inducing drug
mifeprex/mifepristone;
(j) That information on and assistance with reversing the effects of abortion-
inducing drugs are available in the state-prepared materials and on the
cabinet's website[Web site];
(k) An "acknowledgment of risks and consent statement" which the pregnant
patient shall sign. The pregnant patient shall initial by each statement and the
statement shall include but is not limited to the following declarations:
1. That the pregnant patient understands that the abortion-inducing drug
regimen or procedure is intended to end the pregnancy and will result in
the death of the unborn child;
2. That the pregnant patient is not being forced to have an abortion, has the
choice not to have the abortion, and may withdraw consent to the
abortion-inducing drug regimen even after it has been provided;
3. That the pregnant patient understands that the abortion-inducing drug to
be provided has specific risks and may result in specific complications;
4. That the pregnant patient has been given the opportunity to ask
questions about the pregnancy, the development of the unborn child,
alternatives to abortion, the abortion-inducing drug or drugs to be used,
and the risks and complications possible when abortion-inducing drugs
are provided;
5. That the pregnant patient was specifically told that information on the
potential ability of qualified medical professionals to reverse the effects
of a drug-induced abortion is available and where to obtain information
Page 26 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
for assistance in locating a medical professional that can aid in the
reversal of a drug-induced abortion;
6. That the pregnant patient has been provided access to printed materials
on informed consent for abortion;
7. That the pregnant patient has been given the name and phone number of
the associated physician who has agreed to provide medical care and
treatment in the event of complications associated with the abortion-
inducing drug regimen or procedure;
8. That the qualified physician will schedule an in-person follow-up visit
for the patient for approximately seven (7) to fourteen (14) days after
providing the abortion-inducing drug or drugs to confirm that the
pregnancy is completely terminated and to assess any degree of bleeding
and other complications;
9. That the pregnant patient has received or been given sufficient
information to give informed consent to the abortion-inducing drug
regimen or procedure; and
10. That the patient has a private right of action to sue the qualified
physician under the laws of Kentucky if the patient feels coerced or
misled prior to obtaining an abortion;
(l) A qualified physician's declaration that states that the qualified physician has
explained the abortion-inducing drug or drugs to be provided, has provided all
of the information required in paragraph (k) of this subsection, and has
answered all of the woman's questions, shall be signed by the qualified
physician; and
(m) If prescribing for the purpose of inducing an abortion, a qualified physician
shall include the following on the prescription for an abortion-inducing drug:
"For The Purpose of Abortion Inducement".
Page 27 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
Section 12. KRS 311.780 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No abortion shall be performed or prescribed knowingly after the unborn child may
reasonably be expected to have reached viability, except when:
(a) Necessary to preserve the life or health of the woman; or
(b) There is a fetal anomaly or the fetus is incompatible with sustained life
outside the womb.
(2) In those instances where an abortion is performed under this section, the person
performing the abortion shall take all reasonable steps in keeping with reasonable
medical practices to preserve the life and health of the child, including but not
limited to KRS 311.760(2), except when the abortion is performed under
subsection (1)(b) of this section.
Section 13. KRS 311.781 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 311.781 to 311.786:
(1) "Fertilization" means the fusion of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum;
(2) "Gestational age" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.7701;
(3) "Good-faith medical judgment" means a medical judgment that would be made
by a reasonably prudent physician, knowledgeable about the case and the
treatment possibilities with respect to the medical conditions involved;
(4) "Lethal fetal anomaly" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act;
(5) "Medical emergency" means a condition that in the physician's good-
faith[reasonable] medical judgment, based upon the facts known to the physician at
that time, so complicates the woman's pregnancy as to necessitate the immediate
performance or inducement of an abortion in order to prevent the death of the
pregnant woman or to avoid a serious risk of the substantial and irreversible
impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman that delay in the
performance or inducement of the abortion would create;
(6)[(4)] "Pain-capable unborn child" means an unborn child of a probable gestational
Page 28 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
age of fifteen (15) weeks or more;
(7)[(5)] "Physician" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.720;
(8)[(6)] "Probable gestational age" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.720;
[(7) "Reasonable medical judgment" means a medical judgment that would be made by
a reasonably prudent physician, knowledgeable about the case and the treatment
possibilities with respect to the medical conditions involved;]
(9)[(8)] "Serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily
function" means any medically diagnosed condition that so complicates the
pregnancy of the woman as to directly or indirectly cause the substantial and
irreversible impairment of a major bodily function. A medically diagnosed
condition that constitutes a "serious risk of the substantial and irreversible
impairment of a major bodily function" includes pre-eclampsia, inevitable abortion,
and premature rupture of the membranes, but does not include a condition related to
the woman's mental health;[ and]
(10)[(9)] "Unborn child" means an individual organism of the species homo sapiens
from fertilization until live birth; and
(11) "Viability" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act.
Section 14. KRS 311.782 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No person shall intentionally perform or induce or intentionally attempt to perform
or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman when the probable gestational age of
the unborn child is fifteen (15) weeks or greater, except as provided in Sections 2,
9, 10, and 12 of this Act and subsection (2) of this section.
(2) There[It] shall be a rebuttable presumption[an affirmative defense] to a charge
under subsection (1) of this section that the physician complied with the
requirements of this section,[abortion was intentionally performed or induced or
intentionally attempted to be performed or induced by a physician] and that the
physician determined, in the physician's good-faith[reasonable] medical judgment,
Page 29 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
based on the facts known to the physician at that time, that any[either] of the
following applied:
(a) The probable gestational age of the unborn child was less than fifteen (15)
weeks;[ or]
(b) The abortion was necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to
avoid a serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major
bodily function of the pregnant woman. No abortion shall be necessary if it is
based on a claim or diagnosis that the pregnant woman will engage in conduct
that would result in her death or in substantial and irreversible impairment of
a major bodily function or if it is based on any reason related to her mental
health;
(c) In the good-faith belief of the physician, the pregnancy was the result of
rape under KRS 510.040, 510.050, 510.060, or incest under KRS 530.020,
and the fetus had not reached viability; or
(d) The abortion was necessary because of a lethal fetal anomaly or the fetus
was incompatible with sustained life outside the womb.
(3) (a) Except when a medical emergency exists that prevents compliance with KRS
311.783, the rebuttable presumption[affirmative defense] set forth in
subsection (2)(a) of this section shall[does] not apply unless the physician
who intentionally performs or induces or intentionally attempts to perform or
induce the abortion makes a determination of the probable gestational age of
the unborn child as required by KRS 311.783(1) or relied upon such a
determination made by another physician and certifies in writing, based on the
results of the tests performed, that in the physician's good-faith[reasonable]
medical judgment the unborn child's probable gestational age is less than
fifteen (15) weeks.
(b) Except when a medical emergency exists that prevents compliance with one
Page 30 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
(1) or more of the following conditions, the rebuttable
presumption[affirmative defense] set forth in subsection (2)(b) of this section
shall[does] not apply unless the physician who intentionally performs or
induces or intentionally attempts to perform or induce the abortion complies
with all of the following conditions:
1. The physician who intentionally performs or induces or intentionally
attempts to perform or induce the abortion certifies in writing that, in the
physician's good-faith[reasonable] medical judgment, based on the facts
known to the physician at that time, the abortion is necessary to prevent
the death of the pregnant woman or to avoid a serious risk of the
substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the
pregnant woman;
2. A different physician not professionally related to the physician
described in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph certifies in writing that,
in that different physician's good-faith[reasonable] medical judgment,
based on the facts known to that different physician at that time, the
abortion is necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman or to
avoid a serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a
major bodily function of the pregnant woman;
3. The physician intentionally performs or induces or intentionally
attempts to perform or induce the abortion in a hospital or other health
care facility that has appropriate neonatal services for premature infants
unless the abortion is performed in accordance with subsection (2)(c)
or (d) of this section;
4. The physician who intentionally performs or induces or intentionally
attempts to perform or induce the abortion terminates or attempts to
terminate the pregnancy in the manner that provides the best opportunity
Page 31 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
for the unborn child to survive, unless that physician determines, in the
physician's good-faith[reasonable] medical judgment, based on the facts
known to the physician at that time, that the termination of the
pregnancy in that manner poses a greater risk of death of the pregnant
woman or a greater risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of
a major bodily function of the pregnant woman than would other
available methods of abortion, or the termination of the pregnancy is
performed in accordance with subsection (2)(c) or (d) of this section;
5. The physician certifies in writing the available method or techniques
considered and the reasons for choosing the method or technique
employed; and
6. The physician who intentionally performs or induces or intentionally
attempts to perform or induce the abortion has arranged for the
attendance in the same room in which the abortion is to be performed or
induced or attempted to be performed or induced at least one (1) other
physician who is to take control of, provide immediate medical care for,
and take all reasonable steps necessary to preserve the life and health of
the unborn child immediately upon the child's complete expulsion or
extraction from the pregnant woman.
(4) The state Board of Medical Licensure shall revoke a physician's license to practice
medicine in this state if the physician violates or fails to comply with this section.
(5) Any physician who intentionally performs or induces or intentionally attempts to
perform or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman with actual knowledge that
none[neither] of the rebuttable presumptions[affirmative defenses] set forth in
subsection (2) of this section apply[applies], or with a heedless indifference as to
whether any rebuttable presumption[either affirmative defense] applies, is liable in
a civil action for compensatory and punitive damages and reasonable attorney's fees
Page 32 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
to any person, or the representative of the estate of any person including but not
limited to an unborn child, who sustains injury, death, or loss to person or property
as the result of the performance or inducement or the attempted performance or
inducement of the abortion. In any action under this subsection, the court also may
award any injunctive or other equitable relief that the court considers appropriate.
(6) A pregnant woman on whom an abortion is intentionally performed or induced or
intentionally attempted to be performed or induced in violation of subsection (1) of
this section is not guilty of violating subsection (1) of this section or of attempting
to commit, conspiring to commit, or complicity in committing a violation of
subsection (1) of this section.
Section 15. KRS 311.783 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except in a medical emergency that prevents compliance with this section, no
physician shall intentionally perform or induce or intentionally attempt to perform
or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman unless, prior to the performance or
inducement of the abortion or the attempt to perform or induce the abortion, the
physician determines, in the physician's good-faith[reasonable] medical judgment,
the unborn child's probable gestational age. The physician shall make that
determination after making inquiries of the pregnant woman and performing any
medical examinations or tests of the pregnant woman the physician considers
necessary as a reasonably prudent physician, knowledgeable about the case and
medical conditions involved, would consider necessary to determine the unborn
child's probable gestational age.
(2) Except in a medical emergency that prevents compliance with this section, no
physician shall intentionally perform or induce or intentionally attempt to perform
or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman after the unborn child reaches the
probable gestational age of fifteen (15) weeks without first entering the
determination made in subsection (1) of this section and the associated findings of
Page 33 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
the medical examination and tests in the medical record of the pregnant woman.
(3) The state Board of Medical Licensure shall suspend a physician's license to practice
medicine in this state for a period of not less than six (6) months if the physician
violates this section.
(4) The physician shall submit a report on a form provided by the cabinet that includes
at a minimum the information required by KRS 213.101 and:
(a) The unborn child's probable gestational age determined by the physician; and
(b) The results of inquiries of the pregnant woman and any medical examinations
or tests performed.
Section 16. KRS 311.787 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Bodily dismemberment, crushing, or human vivisection" means a procedure
in which a person, with the purpose of causing the death of an unborn child,
dismembers the living unborn child and extracts portions, pieces, or limbs of
the unborn child from the uterus through the use of clamps, grasping forceps,
tongs, scissors, or a similar instrument that, through the convergence of two
(2) rigid levers, slices, crushes, or grasps, or performs any combination of
those actions on, any portion, piece, or limb of the unborn child's body to cut
or separate the portion, piece, or limb from the body. The term includes a
procedure that is used to cause the death of an unborn child and in which
suction is subsequently used to extract portions, pieces, or limbs of the unborn
child after the unborn child's death;
(b) "Lethal fetal anomaly" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act;
(c) "Medical emergency" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.720;
(d)[(c)] "Probable gestational age" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.720;[
and]
(e)[(d)] "Unborn child" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.781; and
Page 34 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
(f) "Viability" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act.
(2) No person shall intentionally perform or induce or attempt to perform or induce an
abortion on a pregnant woman:
(a) That will result in the bodily dismemberment, crushing, or human vivisection
of the unborn child; and
(b) When the probable gestational age of the unborn child is eleven (11) weeks or
greater;
except in the case of a medical emergency; or when, in the good-faith belief of the
physician, a pregnancy is a result of rape under KRS 510.040, 510.050, or
510.060, or incest under KRS 530.020, and the fetus has not reached viability; or
because of a lethal anomaly or the fetus is incompatible with sustained life
outside of the womb as provided in Sections 2, 9, 10, and 12 of this Act.
(3) A pregnant woman on whom an abortion is performed or induced or attempted to
be performed or induced in violation of subsection (2) of this section is not guilty of
violating subsection (2) of this section or of attempting to commit, conspiring to
commit, or complicity in committing a violation of subsection (2) of this section.
Section 17. KRS 311.800 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No publicly owned hospital or other publicly owned health care facility shall
perform or permit the performance of abortions, except:
(a) To save the life of the pregnant woman or to avoid a serious risk of the
substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the
pregnant woman;
(b) To remove a dead fetus, ectopic pregnancy, or incomplete miscarriage;
(c) Because of a lethal fetal anomaly or the fetus is incompatible with sustained
life outside the womb; or
(d) If, in the good-faith belief of the physician, the pregnancy is the result of
rape under KRS 510.040, 510.050, or 510.060, or incest under KRS 530.020,
Page 35 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
and the fetus has not reached viability.
(2) In the event that a publicly owned hospital or publicly owned health facility is
performing or about to perform an abortion in violation of subsection (1) of this
section, and law enforcement authorities in the county have failed or refused to take
action to stop such a practice, any resident of the county in which the hospital or
health facility is located, may apply to the Circuit Court of that county for an
injunction or other court process to require compliance with subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) No private hospital or private health care facility shall be required to, or held liable
for refusal to, perform or permit the performance of abortion contrary to its stated
ethical policy.
(4) No physician, nurse staff member, or employee of a public or private hospital or
employee of a public or private health care facility, who shall state in writing to
such hospital or health care facility his or her objection to performing, participating
in, or cooperating in, abortion on moral, religious, or professional grounds, be
required to, or held liable for refusal to, perform, participate in, or cooperate in such
abortion.
(5) It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice for the following:
(a) Any person to impose penalties or take disciplinary action against, or to deny
or limit public funds, licenses, certifications, degrees, or other approvals or
documents of qualification to, any hospital or other health care facility due to
the refusal of such hospital or health care facility to perform or permit to be
performed, participate in, or cooperate in, abortion by reason of objection
thereto on moral, religious, or professional grounds, or because of any
statement or other manifestation of attitude by such hospital or health care
facility with respect to abortion;[ or,]
(b) Any person to impose penalties or take disciplinary action against, or to deny
Page 36 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
or limit public funds, licenses, certifications, degrees, or other approvals or
documents of qualification to any physician, nurse, or staff member or
employee of any hospital or health care facility, due to the willingness or
refusal of such physician, nurse or staff member or employee to perform or
participate in abortion by reason of objection thereto on moral, religious, or
professional grounds, or because of any statement or other manifestation of
attitude by such physician, nurse or staff member or employee with respect to
abortion; or[,]
(c) Any public or private agency, institution or person, including a medical,
nursing, or other school, to deny admission to, impose any burdens in terms of
conditions of employment upon, or otherwise discriminate against any
applicant for admission thereto or any physician, nurse, staff member, student,
or employee thereof, based upon[on account of] the willingness or refusal of
such applicant, physician, nurse, staff member, student, or employee to
perform or participate in abortion or sterilization by reason of objection
thereto on moral, religious or professional grounds, or because of any
statement or other manifestation of attitude by such person with respect to
abortion or sterilization if that health care facility is not operated exclusively
for the purposes of performing abortions or sterilizations.
Section 18. KRS 213.101 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each abortion as defined in KRS 213.011 which occurs in the Commonwealth,
regardless of the length of gestation, shall be reported to the Vital Statistics Branch
by the person in charge of the institution within three (3) days after the end of the
month in which the abortion occurred. If the abortion was performed outside an
institution, the attending physician shall prepare and file the report within three (3)
days after the end of the month in which the abortion occurred.
(2) The report shall include all the information the physician is required to certify in
Page 37 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
writing or determine under KRS 311.731, 311.732, 311.7704, 311.7705, 311.7706,
311.7707, 311.7735, 311.7736, 311.774, 311.782, and 311.783, and at a minimum:
(a) The full name and address of the physician who performed the abortion or
provided the abortion-inducing drug as defined in KRS 311.7731;
(b) The address at which the abortion was performed or the address at which the
abortion-inducing drug was provided by a qualified physician, or the method
of obtaining the abortion-inducing drug if not provided by a qualified
physician, including mail order, internet order, or by a telehealth provider, in
which case identifying information for the pharmacy, website[Web site]
address, or the telemedicine provider shall be included;
(c) The names, serial numbers, National Drug Codes, lot numbers, and expiration
dates of the specific abortion-inducing drugs that were provided to the
pregnant patient and the dates each were provided;
(d) The full name and address of the referring physician, agency, or service, if
any;
(e) The pregnant patient's city or town, county, state, country of residence, and
zip code;
(f) The pregnant patient's age, race, and ethnicity;
(g) The age or approximate age of the father, if known;
(h) The total number and dates of each previous pregnancy, live birth, and
abortion of the pregnant patient;
(i) The probable gestational and post-fertilization ages of the unborn child, the
methods used to confirm the gestational and post-fertilization ages, and the
date determined;
(j) A list of any pre-existing medical conditions of the pregnant patient that may
complicate her pregnancy, if any, including hemorrhage, infection, uterine
perforation, cervical laceration, retained products, or any other condition;
Page 38 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
(k) Whether the fetus was delivered alive and the length of time the fetus
survived;
(l) Whether the fetus was viable and, if viable, the medical reason for
termination;
(m) Whether a pathological examination of the fetus was performed;
(n) Whether the pregnant patient returned for a follow-up examination, the date
and results of any such follow-up examination, and what reasonable efforts
were made by the qualified physician to encourage the patient to reschedule a
follow-up examination if the appointment was missed;
(o) Whether the woman suffered any complications or adverse events as defined
in KRS 311.7731 and what specific complications or adverse events occurred,
and any follow-up treatment provided as required by KRS 311.774;
(p) Whether the pregnant patient was Rh negative and, if so, was provided with
an Rh negative information fact sheet and treated with the prevailing medical
standard of care to prevent harmful fetal or child outcomes or Rh
incompatibility in future pregnancies;
(q) The amount billed to cover the treatment for specific complications or adverse
events, including whether the treatment was billed to Medicaid, private
insurance, private pay, or other method. This should include ICD-10 codes
reported and charges for any physician, hospital, emergency room,
prescription or other drugs, laboratory tests, and any other costs for treatment
rendered;
(r) The reason for the abortion, if known, including abuse, coercion, harassment,[
or] trafficking, rape, or incest; and
(s) Whether the pregnant patient was tested for sexually transmitted diseases
when providing the informed consent required in KRS 311.725 and 311.7735
twenty-four (24) hours before the abortion procedure or tested at the time of
Page 39 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
the abortion procedure, and if the pregnant patient tested positive, was treated
or referred for treatment and follow-up care.
(3) The report shall not contain:
(a) The name of the pregnant patient;
(b) Common identifiers such as a Social Security number and motor vehicle
operator's license number; and
(c) Any other information or identifiers that would make it possible to ascertain
the patient's identity.
(4) If a person other than the physician described in this subsection makes or maintains
a record required by KRS 311.732, 311.7704, 311.7705, 311.7706, or 311.7707 on
the physician's behalf or at the physician's direction, that person shall comply with
the reporting requirement described in this subsection as if the person were the
physician.
(5) Each prescription issued for an abortion-inducing drug as defined in KRS 311.7731
for which the primary indication is the induction of abortion as defined in KRS
213.011 shall be reported to the Vital Statistics Branch within three (3) days after
the end of the month in which the prescription was issued as required by KRS
311.774, but the report shall not include information which will identify the woman
involved or anyone who may be picking up the prescription on behalf of the
woman.
(6) The name of the person completing the report and the reporting institution shall not
be subject to disclosure under KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(7) By September 30 of each year, the Vital Statistics Branch shall issue a public report
that provides statistics on all data collected, including the type of abortion
procedure used, for the previous calendar year compiled from all of the reports
covering that calendar year submitted to the cabinet in accordance with this section
for each of the items listed in this section. Each annual report shall also provide
Page 40 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
statistics for all previous calendar years in which this section was in effect, adjusted
to reflect any additional information from late or corrected reports. The Vital
Statistics Branch shall ensure that none of the information included in the report
could reasonably lead to the identification of any pregnant woman upon whom an
abortion was performed or attempted. Each annual report shall be made available
on the cabinet's website[Web site].
(8) (a) Any person or institution who fails to submit a report by the end of thirty (30)
days following the due date set in this section shall be subject to a late fee of
five hundred dollars ($500) for each additional thirty (30) day period or
portion of a thirty (30) day period the report is overdue.
(b) Any person or institution who fails to submit a report, or who has submitted
only an incomplete report, more than one (1) year following the due date set
in this section, may in a civil action brought by the Vital Statistics Branch be
directed by a court of competent jurisdiction to submit a complete report
within a time period stated by court order or be subject to contempt of court.
(c) Failure by any physician to comply with the requirements of this section,
other than filing a late report, or to submit a complete report in accordance
with a court order shall subject the physician to KRS 311.595.
(9) Intentional falsification of any report required under this section is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(10) The Vital Statistics Branch shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to assist in compliance with this section.
(11) (a) The Office of the Inspector General, Cabinet for Health and Family Services,
shall annually audit the required reporting of abortion-related information to
the Vital Statistics Branch in this section and KRS 213.172, and in so doing,
shall function as a health oversight agency of the Commonwealth for this
specific purpose.
Page 41 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
(b) The Office of the Inspector General shall ensure that none of the information
included in the audit report could reasonably lead to the identification of any
pregnant woman upon whom an abortion was performed or attempted.
(c) If any personally identifiable information is viewed or recorded by the Office
of the Inspector General in conducting an audit authorized by this subsection,
the information held by the Inspector General shall not be subject to the
Kentucky Open Records Act, shall be confidential, and shall only be released
upon court order.
(d) The Inspector General shall submit a written report to the General Assembly
and the Attorney General by October 1 of each year. The reports shall include
findings from:
1. The audit required in this subsection, including any identified reporting
deficiencies; and
2. All abortion facility inspections, including any violations of KRS
216B.0431 and 216B.0435.
Section 19. KRS 216B.400 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Where a person has been determined to be in need of emergency care by any person
with admitting authority, the person shall not be denied admission by reason only of
his or her inability to pay for services to be rendered by the hospital.
(2) Every hospital of this state which offers emergency services shall provide that a
physician, a sexual assault nurse examiner, who shall be a registered nurse licensed
in the Commonwealth and credentialed by the Kentucky Board of Nursing as
provided under KRS 314.142, or another qualified medical professional, as defined
by administrative regulation promulgated by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet
in consultation with the Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee as
defined in KRS 403.707, is available on call twenty-four (24) hours each day for the
examinations of persons seeking treatment as victims of sexual offenses as defined
Page 42 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
by KRS 510.040, 510.050, 510.060, 510.070, 510.080, 510.090, 510.110, 510.120,
510.130, 510.140, 530.020, 530.064(1)(a), and 531.310.
(3) An examination provided in accordance with this section of a victim of a sexual
offense may be performed in a sexual assault examination facility as defined in
KRS 216B.015. An examination under this section shall apply only to an
examination of a victim.
(4) The physician, sexual assault nurse examiner, or other qualified medical
professional, acting under a statewide medical forensic protocol which shall be
developed by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet in consultation with the Sexual
Assault Response Team Advisory Committee as defined in KRS 403.707, and
promulgated by the secretary of justice and public safety pursuant to KRS Chapter
13A shall, upon the request of any peace officer or prosecuting attorney, and with
the consent of the victim, or upon the request of the victim, examine the victim for
the purposes of providing basic medical care relating to the incident and gathering
samples that may be used as physical evidence. This examination shall include but
not be limited to:
(a) Basic treatment and sample gathering services; and
(b) Laboratory tests, as appropriate.
(5) Each victim shall be informed of available services for treatment of sexually
transmitted infections, pregnancy, and other medical and psychiatric problems.
Pregnancy counseling shall not include abortion counseling or referral information,
unless it is reasonably believed the sexual assault is rape under KRS 510.040,
510.050, or 510.060, or incest under KRS 530.020.
(6) Each victim shall be informed of available crisis intervention or other mental health
services provided by regional rape crisis centers providing services to victims of
sexual assault.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a minor may consent to examination
Page 43 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
under this section. This consent is not subject to disaffirmance because of minority,
and consent of the parents or guardians of the minor is not required for the
examination.
(8) (a) The examinations provided in accordance with this section and other services
provided to a victim pursuant to subsection (9) of this section shall be paid for
by the Crime Victims Compensation Board at a rate to be determined by the
administrative regulation promulgated by the board in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A after consultation with the Sexual Assault Response Team
Advisory Committee as defined in KRS 403.707. Payment for services
rendered pursuant to subsection (9) of this section shall be made at a rate not
to exceed the Medicaid reimbursement rate for the same or similar services.
(b) Upon receipt of a completed claim form supplied by the board and an
itemized billing for a forensic sexual assault examination or related services
that are within the scope of practice of the respective provider and were
performed no more than twelve (12) months prior to submission of the form,
the board shall reimburse the hospital or sexual assault examination facility,
pharmacist, health department, physician, sexual assault nurse examiner, or
other qualified medical professional as provided in administrative regulations
promulgated by the board in accordance with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A.
Reimbursement shall be made to an out-of-state nurse who is credentialed in
the other state to provide sexual assault examinations, an out-of-state hospital,
or an out-of-state physician if the sexual assault occurred in Kentucky.
(c) Independent investigation by the Crime Victims Compensation Board shall
not be required for payment of claims under this section; however, the board
may require additional documentation or proof that the forensic medical
examination was performed.
(9) When an examination of a victim of a sexual offense is provided in accordance with
Page 44 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
this section, no charge shall be made to the victim by the hospital, the sexual assault
examination facility, the physician, the pharmacist, the health department, the
sexual assault nurse examiner, other qualified medical professional, the victim's
insurance carrier, or the Commonwealth for:
(a) Sexual assault examinations, whether or not the exam is completed;
(b) Prophylactic medical treatment;
(c) Strangulation assessments; or
(d) Other medical tests or services, including triage and ambulance expenses,
related to the incident, exam, or treatment which occur on the same date as the
original exam.
(10) (a) Each victim shall have the right to determine whether a report or other
notification shall be made to law enforcement, except where reporting of
abuse and neglect of a child or a vulnerable adult is required, as set forth in
KRS 209.030 and 620.030. No victim shall be denied an examination,
abortion counseling, or referral information as may be applicable under
subsection (5) of this section, or billed in violation of subsection (9) of this
section, because the victim chooses not to file a police report, cooperate with
law enforcement, or otherwise participate in the criminal justice system.
(b) If the victim chooses to report to law enforcement, the hospital shall notify
law enforcement within twenty-four (24) hours.
(c) 1. All samples collected during an exam where the victim has chosen not
to immediately report to law enforcement shall be stored, released, and
destroyed, if appropriate, as provided in[in accordance with] an
administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet in consultation with the
Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee as defined in KRS
403.707.
Page 45 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
2. Facilities collecting samples pursuant to this section may provide the
required secure storage, sample destruction, and related activities, or
may enter into agreements with other agencies qualified to do so,
pursuant to administrative regulation.
3. All samples collected pursuant to this section shall be stored for at least
one (1) year from the date of collection in accordance with the
administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to this subsection.
4. Notwithstanding KRS 524.140, samples collected during exams where
the victim chose not to report immediately or file a report within one (1)
year after collection may be destroyed as set forth in accordance with
the administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to this subsection.
The victim shall be informed of this process at the time of the
examination. No hospital, sexual assault examination facility, or
designated storage facility shall be liable for destruction of samples after
the required storage period has expired.
Section 20. KRS 311.715 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "public agency funds" means any money, regardless of the
original source of the money, of a public agency.
(2) Public agency funds shall not be used for the purpose of obtaining an abortion or
paying for the performance of an abortion, except when, in the good-faith belief of
the physician, the pregnancy is the result of rape under KRS 510.040, 510.050, or
510.060, or incest under KRS 530.020, and the fetus has not reached viability as
defined under Section 1 of this Act. Public medical facilities may be used for the
purpose of conducting research into or the performance of in-vitro fertilization as
long as such procedures do not result in the intentional destruction of a human
embryo.
(3) Public agency funds shall not be directly or indirectly used, granted, paid, or
Page 46 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
distributed to any entity, organization, or individual that performs, induces, refers
for, or counsels in favor of abortions. This subsection shall not apply to funding
available through KRS 205.510 to 205.560 to the minimum extent necessary to
comply with federal conditions for the state's participation in the program
established by KRS 205.510 to 205.560 or to funding that is used to provide
abstinence education in schools.
(4) (a) Public agency funds shall not be directly or indirectly used, granted, paid, or
distributed to any nonpublic entity or organization described in paragraph
(b)3. of this subsection. This paragraph shall not apply to funding available
through KRS 205.510 to 205.560 to the minimum extent necessary to comply
with federal conditions for the state's participation in the program established
by KRS 205.510 to 205.560 or to funding that is used to provide abstinence
education in schools.
(b) Notwithstanding any other state law to the contrary, all federal family
planning funds shall be awarded to eligible individuals, organizations, or
entities applying to be family planning contractors in the following order of
descending priority:
1. Public agencies that directly provide family planning services, including
state, county, and local community health clinics and federally qualified
health centers;
2. Nonpublic entities that directly provide basic health services, as
described in 42 U.S.C. sec. 254b(b)(1)(A), including family planning
services; and
3. Nonpublic entities that directly provide only family planning services
but do not provide all basic health services as described in 42 U.S.C.
sec. 254b(b)(1)(A).
(c) This subsection shall be effective upon repeal of federal regulations
Page 47 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 959
prohibiting states from prioritizing recipients of federal Public Health Service
Act, Title X Family Planning Program funds.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to deprive a woman of all appropriate
medical care necessary to prevent her physical death.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow public funds to pay for in-vitro
fertilization procedures performed on any individual patient.
Section 21. This Act may be cited as Hadley's Law.
Page 48 of 48
XXXX 1/4/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed